Washington statutes.
RCW 41.26.162

Ex spouse qualifying as surviving spouse.

(1) An ex spouse of a law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system retiree shall qualify as surviving spouse under RCW 41.26.160 or 41.26.161 if the ex spouse has been provided benefits under any currently effective court decree of dissolution or legal separation or in any court order or court-approved property settlement agreement incident to any court decree of dissolution or legal separation. Such an ex spouse shall continue to receive the court-awarded portion of the member's benefit after the member's death as if the member was still alive.

(2) An ex spouse whose benefit resumes as a result of chapter 62, Laws of 2005 shall receive an initial payment equivalent to that portion of the member's benefit received prior to its suspension. The benefit will not be adjusted under RCW 41.26.240 for the period the allowance was suspended.

(3) Chapter 62, Laws of 2005 shall not result in the payment of benefits for the period during which benefits were suspended.

(4) This section shall apply retroactively.

[ 2005 c 62 s 3; 2002 c 158 s 3; 1991 sp.s. c 12 s 2.]